Washington statutes.
RCW 31.40.110

Rules—Penalties.

(1) The director shall adopt rules to enforce the intent and purposes of this chapter. Such rules shall include, but need not be limited to, the following:

(a) Disclosure of conflicts of interest;

(b) Prohibition of false statements made to the director on any form required by the director or during any examination requested by the director; or

(c) Prevention of fraud and undue influence by a licensee.

(2) A violation of any provision of this chapter or any rule of the director adopted under this chapter by an agent, employee, officer, or director of the licensee shall be punishable by a fine, established by the director, not to exceed one hundred dollars for each offense. Each day's continuance of the violation shall be a separate and distinct offense. Each such fine shall be credited to the financial services regulation fund.

[ 2001 c 177 s 10; 1994 c 92 s 270; 1989 c 212 s 11.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2001 c 177: See note following RCW 43.320.080.